Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-1321
Arbitration board; decision; findings; provided to parties; filed with Nebraska Power Review Board.

A copy of the decision and accompanying findings and conclusions shall be mailed to each party and its attorney of record by certified mail. The arbitration board shall file its decision, together with all pleadings and exhibits filed with the arbitration board, with the secretary of the Nebraska Power Review Board within five days of the date of the decision.

Laws 1979, LB 207, § 21.